Utah statutes.
53-11-109.   Licensure -- Bail enforcement agent.

(1) (a)  In addition to the requirements in Sections 53-11-108 and 53-11-110, an applicant for licensure as a bail enforcement agent shall have a minimum of 2,000 hours of experience consisting of either actual bail recovery work, or work as a law enforcement officer for a federal, state, or local governmental agency.

(b)  The applicant shall substantiate the experience claimed under Subsection (1) as qualifying experience and shall provide:

(i)  the exact details as to the character and nature of the experience on a form prescribed by the department; and

(ii)  certification by the applicant's employers, which is subject to independent verification by the board.

(c)  If an applicant is unable to supply written certification of experience from an employer in whole or in part, an applicant may offer written certification from persons other than an employer covering the same subject matter for consideration by the board.

(d)  The burden of proving completion of the required experience is on the applicant.

(2)  An applicant for license renewal shall have completed not less than eight hours of continuing classroom instruction.



Enacted by Chapter 257, 1998 General Session

